trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="pripovije/tka__n"><!--With and without sibilarization --><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl--><!--consonant shift in plural-->
      <e><p><l>tka</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tku</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tki</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tki</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tko</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkom</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tki</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tka</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tkâ</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dakâ</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>daka</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkama</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkama</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkama</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="naran/ča__n"><!--With and without sibilarization --><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl--><!--consonant shift in plural-->
      <e><p><l>ča</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ču</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>či</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>či</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čo</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čom</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>či</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ča</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>čâ</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ačâ</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ača</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čama</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čama</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čama</l><r>ča<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sest/ra__n"><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ru</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ri</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ri</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ro</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rom</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ri</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>râ</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>arâ</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ara</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rama</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rama</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rama</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="buk/va__n"><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl-->
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vo</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vom</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vi</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>va</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vâ</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>avâ</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ava</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vama</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vama</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vama</l><r>va<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="koric/e__n"><!--Pluralia tantum-->
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>â</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ama</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ama</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ama</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="naranča"><i>naran</i><par n="naran/ča__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jetra"><i>jet</i><par n="sest/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="igra"><i>ig</i><par n="sest/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sestra"><i>sest</i><par n="sest/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crkva"><i>crk</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokva"><i>lok</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bačva"><i>bač</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="britva"><i>brit</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bukva"><i>buk</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="molitva"><i>molit</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kletva"><i>klet</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spužva"><i>spuž</i><par n="buk/va__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korice"><i>koric</i><par n="koric/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poklade"><i>poklad</i><par n="koric/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vile"><i>vil</i><par n="koric/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sestra"><i>sest</i><par n="sest/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jezgra"><i>jezg</i><par n="sest/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šifra"><i>šif</i><par n="sest/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zagonetka"><i>zagone</i><par n="pripovije/tka__n"/></e>
